date.foma
# Date support for Spanish with documentation
# Writen by Matthew C.
# The format is: DD/MM/YYYY (or DD/MM/AAAA in Spanish)
# Note: date fsts or fomas can be adapted to your preferred date format for another language, but here we 
# are demonstrating how to do in Spanish. Also, please note that you will need to specify your date format 
# in the tokenizer, placing it in the future tokenization type called date, so the date FST can run in 
# these cases when a date is found according to your language.
# In this case, the separator is / (slash) that helps to identify and translate a date.
define NZDig 1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9 ; 
define Dig %0|NZDig ; 
define Year Dig^4 ; 
# The following conditions is for a new tokenization type, date:
#define Month [Dig^<2] ; 
#define Day [Dig^<2] ; 
# Here, we will indicate translations for each month.
define months29 {02}:febrero ; 
define months30 
{04}:abril | 
{06}:junio | 
{09}:septiembre | 
{11}:noviembre ; 
define months31 
{01}:enero | 
{03}:marzo | 
{05}:mayo | 
{07}:julio | 
{08}:agosto | 
{10}:octubre | 
{12}:diciembre ; 
define separator %/ ; 
# 12 months:
define months {01}|{02}|{03}|{04}|{05}|{06}|{07}|{08}|{09}|{10}|{11}|{12} ; 
# Let's make conditional stuff:
# The base days is up to 29, useful for february.
define daysBase months|{13}|{14}|{15}|{16}|{17}|{18}|{19}|{20}|{21}|{22}|{23}|{24}|{25}|{26}|{27}|{28}|{29} ; 
# For months with 30 days.
define days30 daysBase | {30} ; 
# For months with 31 days.
define days31 days30 | {31} ; 

define DateRule 
# Convert months to words.
months29 -> || .#. daysBase separator _ separator Year .#. ,, 
months30 -> || .#. days30 separator _ separator Year .#. ,, 
months31 -> || .#. days31 separator _ separator Year .#. ,, 
# In Spanish, convert the last slash (separator) to del. Del 2024.
separator -> del || 
.#. daysBase separator months29 .u _ Year .#. , 
.#. days30 separator months30.u _ Year .#. , 
.#. days31 separator months31.u _ Year .#. ,, 
# And convert the first separator to de. 2 de febrero.
separator -> de || 
.#. daysBase _ months29.u separator Year .#. , 
.#. days30 _ months30.u separator Year .#. , 
.#. days31 _ months31.u separator Year .#. ,, 
# And when a day starts with 01, convert it to primero.
{01} -> primero || .#. _ separator months separator Year .#. ; 

# Finally, we have a date support.
regex DateRule ; 
